Texas, session 892, HB136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Sections 11.159(c-1) and (d), Education Code, are amended to read as follows: (c-1)  The agency shall, for the training required by Subsections (b-2) and (c): (1)  provide the training; and (2)  certify the completion of the training by a trustee or candidate for trustee [Subsection (c)(1) must be research-based and designed to support the oversight role of the board of trustees under Section 11.1515]. (d)  A trustee or candidate for trustee may complete training required under Subsections (b-2) and [Subsection] (c) at a regional education service center [or through another authorized provider. A provider must certify the completion of the training by a trustee or candidate]. SECTION 2.  Section 74.025, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 74.025.  EDUCATION PROGRAMS. The court of criminal appeals shall, if adequate funding is available for education programs for judges and court personnel, ensure that adequate education programs are available through an institution of higher education or the State Bar of Texas on an equitable basis for judges and court personnel of courts created under the constitution and laws of this state. SECTION 3.  Sections 418.005(d) and (e), Government Code, are amended to read as follows: (d)  The division may provide the training and may also approve any acceptable course of training provided [offered] by a governmental body [or other entity].  The division shall ensure that at least one course of training approved or provided by the division is available on videotape or a functionally similar and widely available medium at no cost. (e)  The division or governmental body [other entity] providing the training shall provide a certificate of course completion to a person who completes the training required by this section.  A person who completes the training required by this section shall maintain and make available for public inspection the record of the person's completion of the training. SECTION 4.  Sections 551.005(b) and (c), Government Code, are amended to read as follows: (b)  The attorney general shall ensure that the training is made available. The office of the attorney general may provide the training and may also approve any acceptable course of training offered by a governmental body [or other entity]. The attorney general shall ensure that at least one course of training approved or provided by the attorney general is available on videotape or a functionally similar and widely available medium at no cost. The training must include instruction in: (1)  the general background of the legal requirements for open meetings; (2)  the applicability of this chapter to governmental bodies; (3)  procedures and requirements regarding quorums, notice, and recordkeeping under this chapter; (4)  procedures and requirements for holding an open meeting and for holding a closed meeting under this chapter; and (5)  penalties and other consequences for failure to comply with this chapter. (c)  The office of the attorney general or other governmental body [entity] providing the training shall provide a certificate of course completion to persons who complete the training required by this section. A governmental body shall maintain and make available for public inspection the record of its members' completion of the training. SECTION 5.  Sections 552.012(d) and (e), Government Code, are amended to read as follows: (d)  The attorney general shall ensure that the training is made available. The office of the attorney general may provide the training and may also approve any acceptable course of training offered by a governmental body [or other entity]. The attorney general shall ensure that at least one course of training approved or provided by the attorney general is available on videotape or a functionally similar and widely available medium at no cost. The training must include instruction in: (1)  the general background of the legal requirements for open records and public information; (2)  the applicability of this chapter to governmental bodies; (3)  procedures and requirements regarding complying with a request for information under this chapter; (4)  the role of the attorney general under this chapter; and (5)  penalties and other consequences for failure to comply with this chapter. (e)  The office of the attorney general or other governmental body [entity] providing the training shall provide a certificate of course completion to persons who complete the training required by this section. A governmental body shall maintain and make available for public inspection the record of its public officials' or, if applicable, the public information coordinator's completion of the training. SECTION 6.  Section 2063.102(b), Government Code, as effective September 1, 2025, is amended to read as follows: (b)  To be certified under Subsection (a), a cybersecurity training program must: (1)  focus on forming appropriate cybersecurity habits and procedures that protect information resources; [and] (2)  teach best practices and minimum standards established under this subchapter; and (3)  be provided by a state agency or local government. SECTION 7.  Chapter 180, Local Government Code, is amended by adding Section 180.014 to read as follows: Sec. 180.014.  OFFICER CONTINUING EDUCATION TRAINING REQUIREMENTS. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a member of the governing body of a municipality, a member of a school board, an elected county officer, or an individual appointed to fill a vacancy in an elective county office is not required to attend or complete any continuing education training required for the office. (b)  This section does not affect the requirements for training related to any occupational license. SECTION 8.  Section 6.231(c), Tax Code, is amended to read as follows: (c)  Continuing education required by this section must be: (1)  approved by the comptroller; and (2)  provided by the comptroller [a state agency] or an accredited institution of higher education, including an institution that is a part of or associated with an accredited institution of higher education, such as the V. G. Young Institute of County Government. SECTION 9.  The following provisions are repealed: (1)  Section 418.005(g), Government Code; (2)  Section 2063.102(c), Government Code; (3)  Section 81.0025, Local Government Code; (4)  Section 83.003, Local Government Code; and (5)  Section 84.0085, Local Government Code. SECTION 10.  As soon as practicable after the effective date of this Act, the State Board of Education shall modify all rules that are inconsistent with the changes in law made by this Act. SECTION 11.  Section 11.159, Education Code, Sections 418.005, 551.005, 552.012, and 2063.102, Government Code, and Section 6.231, Tax Code, as amended by this Act, apply only to training conducted on or after the effective date of this Act. Training conducted before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect immediately before the effective date of this Act, and that law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 12.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.